West Virginia, session 2025, HB2235.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental Protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 28, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-18-6 of this code, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (hazardous waste management system, 33 CSR 20), is authorized.